District of Columbia statutes.
29-1206.15

Limitations on distributions.

(a)

A statutory trust may not make a distribution, including a distribution under § 29-1208.03(b)(2), if after the distribution:

(1)

The trust would not be able to pay its debts as they become due in the ordinary course of the trust’s activities and affairs; or

(2)

The trust’s total assets would be less than the sum of its total liabilities plus, unless the governing instrument permits otherwise, the amount that would be needed, if the trust were to be dissolved and wound up at the time of the distribution, to satisfy the preferential rights upon dissolution and winding up of beneficial owners and transferees whose preferential rights are superior to the right to receive distributions of the persons receiving the distribution.

(b)

A trustee may base a determination that a distribution is not prohibited under subsection (a) of this section on:

(1)

Financial statements prepared on the basis of accounting practices and principles that are reasonable in the circumstances; or

(2)

A fair valuation or other method that is reasonable under the circumstances.

(c)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this section, the effect of a distribution under subsection (a) of this section is measured:

(1)

In the case of a distribution by purchase, redemption, or other acquisition of a beneficial interest, as of the earlier of the date:

(A)

Money or other property is transferred or debt is incurred by the trust; or

(B)

The person entitled to the distribution ceases to own the interest or rights being acquired by the trust in return for the distribution;

(2)

In the case of any other distribution of indebtedness, as of the date the indebtedness is distributed; and

(3)

In all other cases, as of the date:

(A)

The distribution is authorized, if the payment occurs not later than 120 days after that date; or

(B)

The payment is made, if the payment occurs more than 120 days after the distribution is authorized.

(d)

A statutory trust’s indebtedness to a beneficial owner or transferee incurred by reason of a distribution made in accordance with this section is at parity with the trust’s indebtedness to its general, unsecured creditors, except to the extent subordinated by agreement.

(e)

A statutory trust’s indebtedness, including indebtedness issued as a distribution, is not a liability for purposes of subsection (a) of this section if the terms of the indebtedness provide that payment of principal and interest are made only if and to the extent that payment of a distribution could then be made under this section. If indebtedness is issued as a distribution, each payment of principal or interest is treated as a distribution, the effect of which is measured on the date the payment is actually made.

(f)

In measuring the effect of a distribution under § 29-1208.03(b)(2), the debts, obligations, and other liabilities of a dissolved statutory trust do not include any claim that has been disposed of under § 29-1208.04, 29-1208.05, or 29-1208.06.

Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(l)(7)(H), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-1204.02, § 29-1205.09, and § 29-1206.16.
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.